Idaho, session 2026, S1416.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of Species, Min-
erals, and Energy Coordination the following amounts to be expended accord-
ing to the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $925,600 $760,100 $1,685,700
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 219,700 62,000 281,700
Renewable Energy Resources
Fund 181,300 42,500 223,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 122,100 89,200 $10,609,800 10,821,100
Petroleum Price Violation
Fund 246,900 178,600 $15,900 58,000 499,400
Federal Grant
Fund 1,386,500 641,300 29,000 30,538,900 32,595,700
TOTAL $3,082,100 $1,773,700 $44,900 $41,206,700 $46,107,400
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Pursuant to Section 67-3519, Idaho Code,
the Office of Species, Minerals, and Energy Coordination is authorized no


more than twenty-three (23.00) full-time equivalent positions at any point
during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, unless specifically
authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources is hereby re-
duced from the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the pe-
riod July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund $274,700 $62,000 $336,700
Renewable Energy Resources
Fund 206,900 42,500 249,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 21,800 12,000 33,800
Petroleum Price Violation
Fund 266,400 178,600 $15,900 $58,000 518,900
Federal Grant
Fund 776,400 467,200 0 10,398,900 11,642,500
TOTAL $1,546,200 $762,300 $15,900 $10,456,900 $12,781,300
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation to the Office of Species Conservation is hereby reduced
from the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $1,001,000 $760,100 $1,761,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 50,000 50,000
Federal Grant
Fund 812,100 174,100 $29,000 $17,140,000 18,155,200
TOTAL $1,813,100 $984,200 $29,000 $17,140,000 $19,966,300


SECTION 5. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other appropriation
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources is hereby reduced by eleven
(11.00) for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other appropriation
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Office of Species Conservation is hereby reduced by sixteen (16.00)
for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.